Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202046-1143
Other violations; penalty; recovery of costs.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of the Nebraska Chemigation Act for which a specific penalty is not provided shall be (1) subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each day at each site where a violation occurs for the first violation and not less than one thousand dollars and not more than five thousand dollars for each day at each site where a violation occurs for each subsequent violation or (2) guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day of continued violation shall constitute a separate offense. The court may issue such injunctive orders as may be necessary to prohibit continued violations of the Nebraska Chemigation Act. When the Attorney General, a county attorney, or a private attorney brings an action on behalf of a district to recover a civil penalty under this section, the district shall recover the costs of the action if a civil penalty is awarded.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 43;

Laws 2015, LB207, § 5.